Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB570.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Affordable Housing for Working Families Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Community center." An indoor or outdoor building, space, structure or improvement intended for active or passive recreation, including parks, ball fields, meeting halls and classrooms, that accommodate either organized or informal activity and are oriented toward serving residents of the municipality.1234567891011121314151617 "Developer." A person or entity who engages in the development or rehabilitation of real estate for residential occupancy and is responsible for the development of the real estate, including acquisition, design, construction, repairing, leasing, sale, operation and financing."Low-income housing." Affordable housing that is reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income that does not exceed 80% of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located."Middle-income housing." Affordable housing that is reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to more than 80% but less than 120% of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located."Project." The development or rehabilitation of real estate, including acquisition, construction, repairing, leasing, sale, operation and financing."Very-low-income housing." Affordable housing that is reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income that does not exceed 50% of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located.Section 3. Housing development project requirement.(a) Eligibility.--This section shall apply to a developer of a project with 30 or more residential units that:(1) Is approved by a municipal planning board or zoning board to develop a project.(2) Is permissible under either a use variance, a density variance increasing the permissible density at the 20250HB0570PN0574 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 site, a rezoning permitting multiple residential units where not previously permitted, a new or amended redevelopment plan or a new or amended rehabilitation plan.(3) Has a net density of six or more units per acre.(4) Has an application for a construction permit that is submitted on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(b) Reserve.--The developer shall reserve at least:(1) Five percent of the residential units for very-low-income housing.(2) Ten percent of the residential units for low-income housing.(3) Ten percent of the residential units for middle-income housing.(c) Requirements.--A project under this section shall be developed as follows:(1) If more than 25% of market-rate housing units are completed, no less than 10% of very-low-income housing, low-income housing and middle-income housing units shall be completed.(2) If 50% or more of the market-rate housing units are completed, no less than 50% of very-low-income housing, low-income housing and middle-income housing units shall be completed.(3) If 75% or more of the market-rate housing units are completed, no less than 75% of very-low-income housing, low-income housing and middle-income housing units shall be completed.(4) If 90% or more of the market-rate housing units are completed, no less than 100% of very-low-income housing, low-income housing and middle-income housing units shall be 20250HB0570PN0574 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 completed.(d) Withholding of certificate of occupancy.--The municipality shall withhold a certificate of occupancy for market-rate units, at any stage of development, if the requirements of this section are not satisfied.(e) Location of units.--The developer of a project subject to this section may develop the residential units reserved for very-low-income housing, low-income housing and middle-income housing onsite or offsite within the municipality in which the project is located.(f) Contract provisions.--A municipal approval or agreement entered into between a municipality and a developer concerning the development of a project shall incorporate contractual guarantees and procedures ensuring that a residential unit reserved for very-low-income housing, low-income housing and middle-income housing shall continue to be reserved for a period of at least three years.(g) Unit requirements.--For a project that is not age-restricted, at least 30% of all the very-low-income housing, low-income housing and middle-income housing units required by this section shall be two-bedroom units and at least 20% of all the very-low-income housing, low-income housing and middle-income housing units required by this section shall be three-bedroom units.(h) Payment in lieu of construction.--(1) A municipality that is authorized to impose and collect impact or development fees may, in its discretion and in lieu of requiring the construction of very-low-income housing, low-income housing and middle-income housing units under this section, require a developer to pay an impact or 20250HB0570PN0574 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development fee in an amount equal to 30% of the total project cost, as determined by the municipal engineer or other qualified municipal official designated by ordinance. The amount of the fee that may be required under this subsection shall be 25% of the total project cost if the project achieves a silver rating according to the Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design Green Building Rating System as adopted by the United States Green Building Council.(2) A fee required under paragraph (1) shall be paid prior to the issuance of a construction permit for the project.(3) A municipality shall, by ordinance, either:(i) deposit all fees collected under this subsection into an affordable housing trust fund and spend the funds on the development of very-low-income housing or low-income housing within the municipality; or(ii) deposit 50% of the fees collected under this subsection into an affordable housing trust fund and spend those funds on the development of very-low-income housing or low-income housing within the municipality and deposit the remaining 50% of the fee into a community center trust fund and spend the funds on the development of community centers.(i) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the obligation of a municipality to plan and zone to provide through its land use regulations a realistic opportunity for a fair share of its region's present and prospective needs for very-low-income housing or low-income housing. Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter the 20250HB0570PN0574 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 obligations of a developer or municipality to comply with the terms of a court-approved agreement or fair share plan or to prevent a municipality from creating or enforcing requirements beyond the minimum requirements established in this section.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0570PN0574 - 6 - 123456